Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 6
RECEIPT OF FEDERALLY
FORFEITED PROPERTY

16-13-601. Receipt of federally forfeited property.

Any agency charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state, including the Colorado National Guard when participating in operations pursuant to the drug interdiction and enforcement plan required by part 13 of article 3 of title 28, C.R.S., is authorized to accept, receive, dispose of, and expend the property or proceeds from any property forfeited to the federal government and allocated to such agency by the United States attorney general pursuant to 21 U.S.C. sec. 881 (e). Such revenues shall be in addition to the moneys appropriated to such law enforcement agency by the general assembly or any unit of local government. Said property or proceeds may be credited to any lawfully created fund designated to receive proceeds of forfeitures. Any proceeds received pursuant to this section are exempt from the distribution requirements of section 16-13-311 (3)(a).

Source:

L. 86:

Entire part added, p. 750, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 929, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 444, § 2, effective August 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 117, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.